Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,212
Service on foreign corporation.

(MBCA 15.10) (a) The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is the corporation's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign corporation. By being authorized to transact business in this state, the foreign corporation's agent for service of process also consents to service of process directed to the foreign corporation's agent in this state for a search warrant issued pursuant to sections 29-812 to 29-821, or for any other validly issued and properly served court order or subpoena, including those authorized under sections 86-2,106 and 86-2,112, for records or documents that are in the possession of the foreign corporation and are located inside or outside of this state. The consent to service of a court order, subpoena, or search warrant applies to a foreign corporation that is a party or nonparty to the matter for which the court order, subpoena, or search warrant is sought.

(b) A foreign corporation may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the secretary of the foreign corporation or the designated custodian of records at its principal office shown in its application for a certificate of authority or in its most recent biennial report if the foreign corporation:

(1) Has no registered agent or its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served;

(2) Has withdrawn from transacting business in this state under section 21-2,213; or

(3) Has had its certificate of authority revoked under section 21-2,218.

(c) Service is perfected under subsection (b) of this section at the earliest of:

(1) The date the foreign corporation receives the mail;

(2) The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the foreign corporation; or

(3) Five days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed.

(d) This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a foreign corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 212;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 6.
January 1, 2017